Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.260

Involuntary dissolution of towns—Alternative forms of order.

(1) If the court finds that the town has no indebtedness and no assets, the order of dissolution shall be effective forthwith.

(2) If the court finds that the town has assets, but no indebtedness or liabilities, it shall order a sale of the assets other than cash by the sheriff in the manner provided by law for the sale of property on execution. The proceeds of the sale together with any money on hand in the treasury of the town, after deducting the costs of the proceeding and sale, shall be paid into the county treasury and placed to the credit of the school district in which the town is located.

(3) If the court finds that the town has indebtedness or liabilities and assets other than cash, it shall order the sale of the assets as provided in subsection (2) hereof and that the proceeds thereof and the cash on hand shall be applied to the payment of the indebtedness and liabilities.

(4) If the court finds that the town has indebtedness or liabilities, but no assets or that the assets are insufficient to pay the indebtedness and liabilities, it shall order the board of county commissioners to levy from year to year a tax on the taxable property within the boundaries of the former town until the indebtedness and liabilities are paid. All taxes delinquent at the date of dissolution when collected shall be applied to the payment of the indebtedness and liabilities. Any balance remaining from the collection of delinquent taxes and taxes levied under order of the court, after payment of the indebtedness and liabilities shall be placed to the credit of the school district in which the town is located.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.260. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 76 s 3, part; RRS s 8931-3, part.]